Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-3,212
Snowmobiles; refund of fees; when.

Upon transfer of ownership of any snowmobile or in case of loss of possession because of fire, natural disaster, theft, dismantlement, or junking, its registration shall expire, and the registered owner may, by returning the registration certificate and after making affidavit of such transfer or loss to the county official who issued the certificate, receive a refund of that part of the unused fees based on the number of unexpired months remaining in the registration period, except that when such snowmobile is transferred within the same calendar month in which acquired, no refund shall be allowed for such month.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 212;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 29.